dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Hx Y 11
SFX Hx 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Hx 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Hx ец це/xPxE .
SFX Hx ец ца/xPxE .
SFX Hx ец цев/xPxE .
SFX Hx ец цу/xPxE .
SFX Hx ец цах/xPxE .
SFX Hx ец цам/xPxE .
SFX Hx ец цем/xPxE .
SFX Hx ец цами/xPxE .
SFX Hx ец че/xPxE .

SFX Hy Y 68
SFX Hy ти л .
SFX Hy ти ла .
SFX Hy ти ло .
SFX Hy ти ли .
SFX Hy здити жджу .
SFX Hy ти м .
SFX Hy ти ш .
SFX Hy ти 0 .
SFX Hy ти мо .
SFX Hy и е .
SFX Hy ити ет .
SFX Hy ти х .
SFX Hy ти ше .
SFX Hy ти хмо .
SFX Hy ти сте .
SFX Hy ти ху .
SFX Hy ити ечи .
SFX Hy ити еча .
SFX Hy ити ече .
SFX Hy ти мы .
SFX Hy ти мого .
SFX Hy ти мому .
SFX Hy ти мым .
SFX Hy ти мом .
SFX Hy ти мо .
SFX Hy ти ма .
SFX Hy ти му .
SFX Hy ти мој .
SFX Hy ти моју .
SFX Hy ти ми .
SFX Hy ти ме .
SFX Hy ти мых .
SFX Hy ти мым .
SFX Hy ти мыми .
SFX Hy ти вши .
SFX Hy ти вшего .
SFX Hy ти вшему .
SFX Hy ти вшим .
SFX Hy ти вшем .
SFX Hy ти вших .
SFX Hy ти вшими .
SFX Hy ти вша .
SFX Hy ти вшу .
SFX Hy ти вшеј .
SFX Hy ти вшеју .
SFX Hy ти вше .
SFX Hy здити жджены .
SFX Hy здити ждженого .
SFX Hy здити ждженому .
SFX Hy здити ждженым .
SFX Hy здити ждженом .
SFX Hy здити жджени .
SFX Hy здити жджене .
SFX Hy здити ждженых .
SFX Hy здити жджеными .
SFX Hy здити жджена .
SFX Hy здити жджену .
SFX Hy здити ждженој .
SFX Hy здити ждженоју .
SFX Hy здити жджено .
SFX Hy здити ждженје/xPxE .
SFX Hy здити ждженја/xPxE .
SFX Hy здити ждженју/xPxE .
SFX Hy здити ждженјем/xPxE .
SFX Hy здити жджениј/xPxE .
SFX Hy здити ждженјам/xPxE .
SFX Hy здити ждженјами/xPxE .
SFX Hy здити ждженјах/xPxE .

SFX Hz Y 72
SFX Hz сти дл .
SFX Hz сти дла .
SFX Hz сти дло .
SFX Hz сти дли .
SFX Hz сти ду .
SFX Hz сти дем .
SFX Hz сти деш .
SFX Hz сти де .
SFX Hz сти демо .
SFX Hz сти дете .
SFX Hz сти дут .
SFX Hz сти дех .
SFX Hz сти деше .
SFX Hz сти дехмо .
SFX Hz сти десте .
SFX Hz сти деху .
SFX Hz сти ди .
SFX Hz сти димо .
SFX Hz сти дите .
SFX Hz сти дучи .
SFX Hz сти дучего .
SFX Hz сти дучему .
SFX Hz сти дучим .
SFX Hz сти дучем .
SFX Hz сти дучих .
SFX Hz сти дучими .
SFX Hz сти дуча .
SFX Hz сти дучу .
SFX Hz сти дучеј .
SFX Hz сти дучеју .
SFX Hz сти дуче .
SFX Hz сти домы .
SFX Hz сти домого .
SFX Hz сти домому .
SFX Hz сти домым .
SFX Hz сти домом .
SFX Hz сти домо .
SFX Hz сти дома .
SFX Hz сти дому .
SFX Hz сти домој .
SFX Hz сти домоју .
SFX Hz сти доми .
SFX Hz сти доме .
SFX Hz сти домых .
SFX Hz сти домым .
SFX Hz сти домыми .
SFX Hz сти домо .
SFX Hz сти дши .
SFX Hz сти дша .
SFX Hz сти дше .
SFX Hz сти дены .
SFX Hz сти деного .
SFX Hz сти деному .
SFX Hz сти деным .
SFX Hz сти деном .
SFX Hz сти дени .
SFX Hz сти дене .
SFX Hz сти деных .
SFX Hz сти деными .
SFX Hz сти дена .
SFX Hz сти дену .
SFX Hz сти деној .
SFX Hz сти деноју .
SFX Hz сти дено .
SFX Hz сти денје/xPxE .
SFX Hz сти денја/xPxE .
SFX Hz сти денју/xPxE .
SFX Hz сти денјем/xPxE .
SFX Hz сти дениј/xPxE .
SFX Hz сти денјам/xPxE .
SFX Hz сти денјами/xPxE .
SFX Hz сти денјах/xPxE .

SFX IA Y 9
SFX IA 0 0/xPxE .
SFX IA е е/xPxBxO .
SFX IA е а/xPxE .
SFX IA е 0 .
SFX IA е у/xPxE .
SFX IA е ах/xPxE .
SFX IA е ам/xPxE .
SFX IA 0 м/xPxE .
SFX IA е ами/xPxE .

SFX IB Y 37
SFX IB ти л .
SFX IB ти ла .
SFX IB ти ло .
SFX IB ти ли .
SFX IB ти ју .
SFX IB ти м .
SFX IB ти јеш .
SFX IB ти ш .
SFX IB ти је .
SFX IB ти 0 .
SFX IB ти јемо .
SFX IB ти мо .
SFX IB ти јете .
SFX IB и е .
SFX IB ти јут .
SFX IB ти х .
SFX IB ти ше .
SFX IB ти хмо .
SFX IB ти сте .
SFX IB ти ху .
SFX IB ти ј .
SFX IB ти јмо .
SFX IB ти јте .
SFX IB ти јучи .
SFX IB ти јуча .
SFX IB ти јуче .
SFX IB ти јемы .
SFX IB ти јема .
SFX IB ти мы .
SFX IB ти ма .
SFX IB ти вши .
SFX IB ти вша .
SFX IB ти вше .
SFX IB ти ны .
SFX IB ти на .
SFX IB ти но .
SFX IB ти нје .

SFX IC Y 68
SFX IC ти л .
SFX IC ти ла .
SFX IC ти ло .
SFX IC ти ли .
SFX IC тити чу .
SFX IC ти м .
SFX IC ти ш .
SFX IC ти 0 .
SFX IC ти мо .
SFX IC и е .
SFX IC ити ет .
SFX IC ти х .
SFX IC ти ше .
SFX IC ти хмо .
SFX IC ти сте .
SFX IC ти ху .
SFX IC ити ечи .
SFX IC ити еча .
SFX IC ити ече .
SFX IC ти мы .
SFX IC ти мого .
SFX IC ти мому .
SFX IC ти мым .
SFX IC ти мом .
SFX IC ти мо .
SFX IC ти ма .
SFX IC ти му .
SFX IC ти мој .
SFX IC ти моју .
SFX IC ти ми .
SFX IC ти ме .
SFX IC ти мых .
SFX IC ти мым .
SFX IC ти мыми .
SFX IC ти вши .
SFX IC ти вшего .
SFX IC ти вшему .
SFX IC ти вшим .
SFX IC ти вшем .
SFX IC ти вших .
SFX IC ти вшими .
SFX IC ти вша .
SFX IC ти вшу .
SFX IC ти вшеј .
SFX IC ти вшеју .
SFX IC ти вше .
SFX IC тити чены .
SFX IC тити ченого .
SFX IC тити ченому .
SFX IC тити ченым .
SFX IC тити ченом .
SFX IC тити чени .
SFX IC тити чене .
SFX IC тити ченых .
SFX IC тити чеными .
SFX IC тити чена .
SFX IC тити чену .
SFX IC тити ченој .
SFX IC тити ченоју .
SFX IC тити чено .
SFX IC тити ченје/xPxE .
SFX IC тити ченја/xPxE .
SFX IC тити ченју/xPxE .
SFX IC тити ченјем/xPxE .
SFX IC тити чениј/xPxE .
SFX IC тити ченјам/xPxE .
SFX IC тити ченјами/xPxE .
SFX IC тити ченјах/xPxE .

SFX ID Y 68
SFX ID ти л .
SFX ID ти ла .
SFX ID ти ло .
SFX ID ти ли .
SFX ID єти жу .
SFX ID єти им .
SFX ID єти иш .
SFX ID єти и .
SFX ID єти имо .
SFX ID єти ите .
SFX ID єти ет .
SFX ID ти х .
SFX ID ти ше .
SFX ID ти хмо .
SFX ID ти сте .
SFX ID ти ху .
SFX ID єти ечи .
SFX ID єти еча .
SFX ID єти ече .
SFX ID єти имы .
SFX ID єти имого .
SFX ID єти имому .
SFX ID єти имым .
SFX ID єти имом .
SFX ID єти имо .
SFX ID єти има .
SFX ID єти иму .
SFX ID єти имој .
SFX ID єти имоју .
SFX ID єти ими .
SFX ID єти име .
SFX ID єти имых .
SFX ID єти имым .
SFX ID єти имыми .
SFX ID ти вши .
SFX ID ти вшего .
SFX ID ти вшему .
SFX ID ти вшим .
SFX ID ти вшем .
SFX ID ти вших .
SFX ID ти вшими .
SFX ID ти вша .
SFX ID ти вшу .
SFX ID ти вшеј .
SFX ID ти вшеју .
SFX ID ти вше .
SFX ID ти ны .
SFX ID ти ного .
SFX ID ти ному .
SFX ID ти ным .
SFX ID ти ном .
SFX ID ти ни .
SFX ID ти не .
SFX ID ти ных .
SFX ID ти ными .
SFX ID ти на .
SFX ID ти ну .
SFX ID ти ној .
SFX ID ти ноју .
SFX ID ти но .
SFX ID ти нје/xPxE .
SFX ID ти нја/xPxE .
SFX ID ти нју/xPxE .
SFX ID ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX ID ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX ID ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX ID ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX ID ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX IE Y 72
SFX IE ти л .
SFX IE ти ла .
SFX IE ти ло .
SFX IE ти ли .
SFX IE ти у .
SFX IE ти ем .
SFX IE ти еш .
SFX IE ти е .
SFX IE ти емо .
SFX IE ти ете .
SFX IE ти ут .
SFX IE ти ех .
SFX IE ти еше .
SFX IE ти ехмо .
SFX IE ти есте .
SFX IE ти еху .
SFX IE ти и .
SFX IE ти имо .
SFX IE ти ите .
SFX IE ти учи .
SFX IE ти учего .
SFX IE ти учему .
SFX IE ти учим .
SFX IE ти учем .
SFX IE ти учих .
SFX IE ти учими .
SFX IE ти уча .
SFX IE ти учу .
SFX IE ти учеј .
SFX IE ти учеју .
SFX IE ти уче .
SFX IE ти омы .
SFX IE ти омого .
SFX IE ти омому .
SFX IE ти омым .
SFX IE ти омом .
SFX IE ти омо .
SFX IE ти ома .
SFX IE ти ому .
SFX IE ти омој .
SFX IE ти омоју .
SFX IE ти оми .
SFX IE ти оме .
SFX IE ти омых .
SFX IE ти омым .
SFX IE ти омыми .
SFX IE ти омо .
SFX IE ти ши .
SFX IE ти ша .
SFX IE ти ше .
SFX IE ти ены .
SFX IE ти еного .
SFX IE ти еному .
SFX IE ти еным .
SFX IE ти еном .
SFX IE ти ени .
SFX IE ти ене .
SFX IE ти еных .
SFX IE ти еными .
SFX IE ти ена .
SFX IE ти ену .
SFX IE ти еној .
SFX IE ти еноју .
SFX IE ти ено .
SFX IE ти енје/xPxE .
SFX IE ти енја/xPxE .
SFX IE ти енју/xPxE .
SFX IE ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX IE ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX IE ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX IE ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX IE ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX IF Y 39
SFX IF ти л .
SFX IF ти ла .
SFX IF ти ло .
SFX IF ти ли .
SFX IF ти х .
SFX IF ти с .
SFX IF ти 0 .
SFX IF ти хмо .
SFX IF ти сте .
SFX IF ыти єх .
SFX IF ыти єше .
SFX IF ыти єхмо .
SFX IF ыти єсте .
SFX IF ыти єху .
SFX IF ыти уду .
SFX IF ыти удеш .
SFX IF ыти уде .
SFX IF ыти удемо .
SFX IF ыти удете .
SFX IF ыти удут .
SFX IF ыти уд .
SFX IF ыти удмо .
SFX IF ыти удте .
SFX IF ти вши .
SFX IF ти вшего .
SFX IF ти вшему .
SFX IF ти вшим .
SFX IF ти вшем .
SFX IF ти вших .
SFX IF ти вшими .
SFX IF ти вша .
SFX IF ти вшу .
SFX IF ти вшеј .
SFX IF ти вшеју .
SFX IF ти вше .
SFX IF и ы .
SFX IF и а .
SFX IF и о .
SFX IF и је .
