dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
конец/Hx
јездити/Hy
извести/Hz
солнце/IA
владати/IB
владєти/IB
захватити/IC
прдєти/ID
клатити/IC
влєзти/IE
быти/IF
чудовишче/IA
красти/Hz
скратити/IC
посветити/IC
грызти/IE
вєнец/Hx
класти/Hz
украсти/Hz
напасти/Hz
ненавидєти/ID
посєтити/IC
схватити/IC
упасти/Hz
одвратити/IC
нести/IE
сєдєти/ID
светити/IC
јајце/IA
везти/IE
вратити/IC
сбоже/IA
гледєти/ID
разпасти/Hz
платити/IC
видєти/ID
обогатити/IC
грнец/Hx
лежишче/IA
игришче/IA
лєзти/IE
заплатити/IC
срдце/IA
повратити/IC
обратити/IC
принести/IE
тратити/IC
изтратити/IC
привезти/IE
забезпаметити/IC
ввести/Hz
обгледєти/ID
донести/IE
прєвести/Hz
ступенишче/IA
потрести/IE
трести/IE
прєгледєти/ID
тајнишче/IA
пропасти/Hz
похытити/IC
сєдалишче/IA
одплатити/IC
однести/IE
одвести/Hz
пасти/Hz
подгледєти/ID
прєнести/IE
прєвезти/IE
прєдвидєти/ID
прєдплатити/IC
снести/IE
внести/IE
изнести/IE
разнести/IE
ввезти/IE
провести/Hz
развести/IE
одвезти/IE
извезти/IE
огледєти/ID
увидєти/ID
угрызти/IE
одгрызти/IE
спасти/Hz
одпасти/Hz
просвєтити/IC
надгледєти/ID
угледєти/ID
разгледєти/ID
догледєти/ID
домче/IA
довезти/IE
изплатити/IC
колјце/IA
курец/Hx
полномочје/IA
прєзвишче/IA
пригледєти/ID
пристанишче/IA
произвести/Hz
снабдєти/ID
срєдишче/IA
утратити/IC
шчитити/IC
затрести/IE
вести/Hz
вгледєти/ID
зашчитити/IC
осамотити/IC
ранец/Hx
себесмртити/IC
осватити/IC
сватити/IC
летишче/IA
училишче/IA
разтратити/IC
чтити/IC
гледишче/IA
гонишче/IA
гробишче/IA
изгнанец/Hx
използти/IE
јаловец/Hx
крижишче/IA
ланец/Hx
мокришче/IA
мравишче/IA
надглавишче/IA
обхватити/IC
образец/Hx
огнишче/IA
подножишче/IA
ползти/IE
поползти/IE
прести/Hz
становишче/IA
стрєлишче/IA
топишче/IA
усести/Hz
возвести/Hz
завратити/IC
земједєлишче/IA
крутити/IC
складишче/IA
трговишче/IA
возбогатити/IC
валец/Hx
жилишче/IA
бдєти/ID
ложе/IA
ложишче/IA
мутити/IC
смутити/IC
смалец/Hx
усмртити/IC
вознести/IE
паствишче/IA
припасти/Hz
спасти/IE
впасти/Hz
посести/Hz
ссести/Hz
засвєтити/IC
развести/Hz
вєче/IA
возвратити/IC
извратити/IC
прєобратити/IC
осиротити/IC
сиротишче/IA
танец/Hx
румєнец/Hx
провртити/IC
запасти/Hz
убєжишче/IA
бодец/Hx
бости/Hz
браздити/Hy
чепец/Hx
гнєздити/Hy
гнојишче/IA
гостинец/Hx
градишче/IA
кладец/Hx
кротити/IC
ленишче/IA
лєтовишче/IA
леговишче/IA
ловишче/IA
млатити/IC
нанести/IE
насытити/IC
навести/Hz
обгрызти/IE
објездити/Hy
обнести/IE
обвести/Hz
оглушети/IB
окотити/IC
опасти/Hz
спрести/Hz
осести/Hz
осветити/IC
освєтити/IC
позлатити/IC
разгрызти/IE
разкрутити/IC
размлатити/IC
развезти/IE
зубец/Hx
привести/Hz
укротити/IC
ледовец/Hx
смлатити/IC
парковишче/IA
стојишче/IA
златити/IC
нрєстилишче/IA
сытити/IC
примєтити/IC
обкрасти/Hz
котити/IC
тризубец/Hx
доползти/IE
потити/IC
спотити/IC
коверец/Hx
изтрести/IE
отрести/IE
возтрести/IE
палец/Hx
блјудце/IA
светилишче/IA
довести/Hz
дробјенец/Hx
завидєти/ID
крајец/Hx
воплотити/IC
прєсести/Hz
скрывалишче/IA
посмєшишче/IA
изпасти/Hz
зрєлишче/IA
